North Dakota, session 69, SB2304.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 57-51.2 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Oil and gas tax revenue allocation withholding - State treasurer - Escrow account.
The state treasurer shall withhold all oil and gas tax revenue allocations under this chapter
and shall deposit the withholdings in an escrow account at the Bank of North Dakota beginning
with allocations in Augus t 2025. The withheld oil and gas tax revenues may be allocated only
after:
1. A tribal governing body and the governor enter a new agreement under this chapter;
and
2. A tribal governing body that enters an agreement under this chapter has submitted to
the federal bureau of Indian affairs all required audit reports and responses to audit
findings.
Page No. 1 25.1209.01000